Missouri, session 2026, SB1175.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 105.669, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
105.451 and 105.669, to read as follows:
105.451. 1. Any person shall be deemed of bad moral
character, untrustworthy, and unfit for elected public
office or employment with the state or any local government
if the person, while holding an elected public office, and
by clothing him or herself with the influence, prestige, or
authority of his or her public office or through any public
or private title, office, or position arising out of or
associated with his or her public office, including, but not
limited to, a caucus or association of elected public
officials, is or has been convicted of:
(1) Stealing campaign funds by deceit pursuant to
section 570.030 or otherwise in violation of any other
provision of law;
(2) Stealing the funds of a caucus or association or
funds intended for a caucus or association by deceit
pursuant to section 570.030 or otherwise in violation of any
other provision of law;

SB 1175 2
(3) Expending campaign funds in violation of section
130.031; or
(4) Converting campaign funds to his or her personal
use in violation of section 130.034.
2. Any person deemed unfit for elected public office
or employment with the state or any local government as
provided in subsection 1 of this section shall forfeit his
or her elected public office or employment and be removed
from said elected public office or employment.
3. Any elected or appointed official who knowingly,
willingly, or purposefully appoints or retains a person
unfit for employment with the state or any local government
as provided in subsection 1 of this section shall forfeit
his or her office.
4. The prosecuting attorney, circuit attorney, or
attorney general, upon receipt of knowledge or information
of any elected public officer or public employee who is
declared unfit for elected public office or employment with
the state or any local government pursuant to subsection 1
or 3 of this section, shall commence an action to remove
from public employment or public office any public employee
or elected public official who is disqualified from holding
public employment or elected public office or has forfeited
his or her public employment or elected public office in
connection with a conviction or violation described in
subsection 1 of this section.
105.669. 1. Any participant of a plan who is
convicted of a felony offense listed in subsection 3 of this
section, which is committed in direct connection with or
directly related to the participant's duties as an employee
on or after August 28, 2014, shall not be eligible to
receive any retirement benefits from the respective plan

SB 1175 3
based on service rendered on or after August 28, 2014,
except a participant may still request from the respective
retirement system a refund of the participant's plan
contributions, including interest credited to the
participant's account.
2. The employer of any participant who is charged or
convicted of a felony offense listed in subsection 3 of this
section, which is committed in direct connection with or
directly related to the participant's duties as an employee
on or after August 28, 2014, shall notify the appropriate
retirement system in which the offender was a participant
and provide information in connection with such charge or
conviction. The plans shall take all actions necessary to
implement the provisions of this section.
3. A felony conviction based on any of the following
offenses or a substantially similar offense provided under
federal law shall result in the ineligibility of retirement
benefits as provided in subsection 1 of this section:
(1) The offense of felony stealing under section
570.030 when such offense involved money, property, or
services valued at five thousand dollars or more;
(2) The offense of felony receiving stolen property
under section 570.080, as it existed before January 1, 2017,
when such offense involved money, property, or services
valued at five thousand dollars or more;
(3) The offense of forgery under section 570.090;
(4) The offense of felony counterfeiting under section
570.103;
(5) The offense of bribery of a public servant under
section 576.010; or
(6) The offense of acceding to corruption under
section 576.020.

SB 1175 4
4. Any participant of a plan who is unfit for elected
public office or employment with the state or any local
government pursuant to subsection 1 of section 105.451 shall
not be eligible to receive any retirement benefits from the
respective plan.
5. The employer of any participant who is declared
unfit for elected public office or employment with the state
or any local government pursuant to subsection 1 of section
105.451 shall notify the appropriate retirement system in
which the public employee or public official was a
participant and provide information in connection with a
conviction or violation described in subsection 1 of section
105.451.
✓